Utah statutes.
78A-6-512.   Review following termination.

(1)  At the conclusion of the hearing in which the court orders termination of the parent-child relationship, the court shall order that a review hearing be held within 90 days after the day on which the parent-child relationship is terminated, if the child has not been permanently placed.

(2)  At that review hearing, the agency or individual vested with custody of the child shall report to the court regarding the plan for permanent placement of the child.  The guardian ad litem shall make recommendations to the court, based on an independent investigation, for disposition meeting the best interests of the child.

(3)  The court may order the agency or individual vested with custody of the child to report, at appropriate intervals, on the status of the child until the plan for permanent placement of the child has been accomplished.



Amended by Chapter 32, 2009 General Session

